Ohio, session 136, SB242.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That sections 2913.02, 2913.51, 4737.04, 7
4737.045, 4737.99, 4738.03, 4738.07, 4738.12, and 4775.09 be 8
amended and sections 4737.046 and 4737.98 of the Revised Code be 9
enacted to read as follows: 10
Sec. 2913.02. (A) No person, with purpose to deprive the 11
owner of property or services, shall knowingly obtain or exert 12
control over either the property or services in any of the 13
following ways: 14
(1) Without the consent of the owner or person authorized 15
to give consent; 16
(2) Beyond the scope of the express or implied consent of 17
the owner or person authorized to give consent; 18
(3) By deception; 19

S. B. No. 242 Page 2
As Introduced
(4) By threat; 20
(5) By intimidation. 21
(B)(1) Whoever violates this section is guilty of theft. 22
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this division or 23
division (B)(3), (4), (5), (6), (7), (8), or (9), or (10) of 24
this section, a violation of this section is misdemeanor theft, 25
a misdemeanor of the first degree. If the value of the property 26
or services stolen is one thousand dollars or more and is less 27
than seven thousand five hundred dollars or if the property 28
stolen is any of the property listed in section 2913.71 of the 29
Revised Code, a violation of this section is theft, a felony of 30
the fifth degree. If the value of the property or services 31
stolen is seven thousand five hundred dollars or more and is 32
less than one hundred fifty thousand dollars, or if the offender 33
has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a felony theft 34
offense within the previous three years, a violation of this 35
section is grand theft, a felony of the fourth degree. If the 36
value of the property or services stolen is one hundred fifty 37
thousand dollars or more and is less than seven hundred fifty 38
thousand dollars, or if the offender two or more times has been 39
convicted of or pleaded guilty to a felony theft offense within 40
the previous three years, a violation of this section is 41
aggravated theft, a felony of the third degree. If the value of 42
the property or services is seven hundred fifty thousand dollars 43
or more and is less than one million five hundred thousand 44
dollars, a violation of this section is aggravated theft, a 45
felony of the second degree. If the value of the property or 46
services stolen is one million five hundred thousand dollars or 47
more, a violation of this section is aggravated theft of one 48
million five hundred thousand dollars or more, a felony of the 49

S. B. No. 242 Page 3
As Introduced
first degree. 50
(3) Except as otherwise provided in division (B)(4), (5), 51
(6), (7), (8), or (9), or (10) of this section, if the victim of 52
the offense is an elderly person, disabled adult, active duty 53
service member, or spouse of an active duty service member, a 54
violation of this section is theft from a person in a protected 55
class, and division (B)(3) of this section applies. Except as 56
otherwise provided in this division, theft from a person in a 57
protected class is a felony of the fifth degree. If the value of 58
the property or services stolen is one thousand dollars or more 59
and is less than seven thousand five hundred dollars, or if the 60
offender has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a felony 61
theft offense within the previous three years, theft from a 62
person in a protected class is a felony of the fourth degree. If 63
the value of the property or services stolen is seven thousand 64
five hundred dollars or more and is less than thirty-seven 65
thousand five hundred dollars, or if the offender two or more 66
times has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a felony theft 67
offense within the previous three years, theft from a person in 68
a protected class is a felony of the third degree. If the value 69
of the property or services stolen is thirty-seven thousand five 70
hundred dollars or more and is less than one hundred fifty 71
thousand dollars, theft from a person in a protected class is a 72
felony of the second degree. If the value of the property or 73
services stolen is one hundred fifty thousand dollars or more, 74
theft from a person in a protected class is a felony of the 75
first degree. If the victim of the offense is an elderly person, 76
in addition to any other penalty imposed for the offense, the 77
offender shall be required to pay full restitution to the victim 78
and to pay a fine of up to fifty thousand dollars. The clerk of 79
court shall forward all fines collected under division (B)(3) of 80

S. B. No. 242 Page 4
As Introduced
this section to the county department of job and family services 81
to be used for the reporting and investigation of elder abuse, 82
neglect, and exploitation or for the provision or arrangement of 83
protective services under sections 5101.61 to 5101.71 of the 84
Revised Code. 85
(4) If the property stolen is a firearm or dangerous 86
ordnance, a violation of this section is grand theft. Except as 87
otherwise provided in this division, grand theft when the 88
property stolen is a firearm or dangerous ordnance is a felony 89
of the third degree, and there is a presumption in favor of the 90
court imposing a prison term for the offense. If the firearm or 91
dangerous ordnance was stolen from a federally licensed firearms 92
dealer, grand theft when the property stolen is a firearm or 93
dangerous ordnance is a felony of the first degree. The offender 94
shall serve a prison term imposed for grand theft when the 95
property stolen is a firearm or dangerous ordnance consecutively 96
to any other prison term or mandatory prison term previously or 97
subsequently imposed upon the offender. 98
(5) If the property stolen is a motor vehicle, a violation 99
of this section is grand theft of a motor vehicle, a felony of 100
the fourth degree. 101
(6) If the property stolen is any dangerous drug, a 102
violation of this section is theft of drugs, a felony of the 103
fourth degree, or, if the offender previously has been convicted 104
of a felony drug abuse offense, a felony of the third degree. 105
(7) If the property stolen is a police dog or horse or an 106
assistance dog and the offender knows or should know that the 107
property stolen is a police dog or horse or an assistance dog, a 108
violation of this section is theft of a police dog or horse or 109
an assistance dog, a felony of the third degree. 110

S. B. No. 242 Page 5
As Introduced
(8) If the property stolen is anhydrous ammonia, a 111
violation of this section is theft of anhydrous ammonia, a 112
felony of the third degree. 113
(9) Except as provided in division (B)(2) of this section 114
with respect to property with a value of seven thousand five 115
hundred dollars or more and division (B)(3) of this section with 116
respect to property with a value of one thousand dollars or 117
more, if the property stolen is a special purpose purchase 118
article as defined in section 4737.04 of the Revised Code or is 119
a bulk merchandise container as defined in section 4737.012 of 120
the Revised Code, a violation of this section is theft of a 121
special purpose purchase article or articles or theft of a bulk 122
merchandise container or containers, a felony of the fifth 123
degree. 124
(10)(10)(a) If the property stolen is a catalytic 125
converter, a violation of this section is theft of a catalytic 126
converter, a felony of the fifth degree. 127
(b) If the offender has previously been convicted of or 128
pleaded guilty to a violation of Chapter 2911. or 2913. of the 129
Revised Code, theft of a catalytic converter is a felony of the 130
fourth degree. 131
(c) If the property stolen is one or more catalytic 132
converters and the offender is a business entity, a violation of 133
this section is enterprise theft of catalytic converters and, 134
notwithstanding section 2929.31 of the Revised Code, is 135
punishable by a fine of not less than ten thousand dollars and 136
not more than fifty thousand dollars per violation, regardless 137
of the number of items involved in the violation. 138
(d) The clerk of the court shall pay any fine imposed 139

S. B. No. 242 Page 6
As Introduced
pursuant to division (B)(10) of this section to the county, 140
township, municipal corporation, park district as created 141
pursuant to section 511.18 or 1545.04 of the Revised Code, or 142
state law enforcement agencies in this state that primarily were 143
responsible for, or involved in, arresting and prosecuting the 144
offender. 145
(11) In addition to the penalties described in division 146
(B)(2) of this section, if the offender committed the violation 147
by causing a motor vehicle to leave the premises of an 148
establishment at which gasoline is offered for retail sale 149
without the offender making full payment for gasoline that was 150
dispensed into the fuel tank of the motor vehicle or into 151
another container, the court may do one of the following: 152
(a) Unless division (B)(10)(b)(B)(11)(b) of this section 153
applies, suspend for not more than six months the offender's 154
driver's license, probationary driver's license, commercial 155
driver's license, temporary instruction permit, or nonresident 156
operating privilege; 157
(b) If the offender's driver's license, probationary 158
driver's license, commercial driver's license, temporary 159
instruction permit, or nonresident operating privilege has 160
previously been suspended pursuant to division (B)(10)(a)(B)(11) 161
(a) of this section, impose a class seven suspension of the 162
offender's license, permit, or privilege from the range 163
specified in division (A)(7) of section 4510.02 of the Revised 164
Code, provided that the suspension shall be for at least six 165
months.; 166
(c) The court, in lieu of suspending the offender's 167
driver's or commercial driver's license, probationary driver's 168
license, temporary instruction permit, or nonresident operating 169

S. B. No. 242 Page 7
As Introduced
privilege pursuant to division (B)(10)(a)(B)(11)(a) or (b) of 170
this section, instead may require the offender to perform 171
community service for a number of hours determined by the court. 172
(11)(12) In addition to the penalties described in 173
division (B)(2) of this section, if the offender committed the 174
violation by stealing rented property or rental services, the 175
court may order that the offender make restitution pursuant to 176
section 2929.18 or 2929.28 of the Revised Code. Restitution may 177
include, but is not limited to, the cost of repairing or 178
replacing the stolen property, or the cost of repairing the 179
stolen property and any loss of revenue resulting from 180
deprivation of the property due to theft of rental services that 181
is less than or equal to the actual value of the property at the 182
time it was rented. Evidence of intent to commit theft of rented 183
property or rental services shall be determined pursuant to the 184
provisions of section 2913.72 of the Revised Code. 185
(C) The sentencing court that suspends an offender's 186
license, permit, or nonresident operating privilege under 187
division (B)(10)(B)(11) of this section may grant the offender 188
limited driving privileges during the period of the suspension 189
in accordance with Chapter 4510. of the Revised Code. 190
Sec. 2913.51. (A) As used in this section: 191
(1) "Bulk merchandise container" has the same meaning as 192
in section 4737.012 of the Revised Code. 193
(2) "Dangerous drug" has the same meaning as in section 194
4729.01 of the Revised Code. 195
(3) "Dangerous ordnance" and "firearm" have the same 196
meanings as in section 2923.11 of the Revised Code. 197
(4) "Motor vehicle" has the same meaning as in section 198

S. B. No. 242 Page 8
As Introduced
4501.01 of the Revised Code. 199
(B) No person shall receive, retain, or dispose of 200
property of another knowing or having reasonable cause to 201
believe that the property has been obtained through commission 202
of a theft offense. 203
(B) (C) It is not a defense to a charge of receiving 204
stolen property in violation of this section that the property 205
was obtained by means other than through the commission of a 206
theft offense if the property was explicitly represented to the 207
accused person as being obtained through the commission of a 208
theft offense. 209
(C) (D) Whoever violates this section is guilty of 210
receiving stolen property. Except as otherwise provided in this 211
division or division (D) (E) or (F) of this section, receiving 212
stolen property is a misdemeanor of the first degree. If the 213
value of the property involved is one thousand dollars or more 214
and is less than seven thousand five hundred dollars, if the 215
property involved is any of the property listed in section 216
2913.71 of the Revised Code, receiving stolen property is a 217
felony of the fifth degree. If the property involved is a motor 218
vehicle, as defined in section 4501.01 of the Revised Code, if 219
the property involved is a dangerous drug, a firearm, or 220
dangerous ordnance, as defined in section 4729.01 of the Revised 221
Code, or if the value of the property involved is seven thousand 222
five hundred dollars or more and is less than one hundred fifty 223
thousand dollars, or if the property involved is a firearm or 224
dangerous ordnance, as defined in section 2923.11 of the Revised 225
Code, receiving stolen property is a felony of the fourth 226
degree. If the value of the property involved is one hundred 227
fifty thousand dollars or more, receiving stolen property is a 228

S. B. No. 242 Page 9
As Introduced
felony of the third degree. 229
(D) (E) Except as provided in division (C) (D) of this 230
section with respect to property involved in a violation of this 231
section with a value of seven thousand five hundred dollars or 232
more, if the property involved in violation of this section is a 233
special purchase article as defined in section 4737.04 of the 234
Revised Codeor Code or a bulk merchandise container as defined 235
in section 4737.012 of the Revised Code, a violation of this 236
section is receiving a stolen special purchase article or 237
articles or receiving a stolen bulk merchandise container or 238
containers, a felony of the fifth degree. 239
(F)(1) Except as otherwise provided in this division, if 240
the property involved is a catalytic converter, a violation of 241
this section is receiving a stolen catalytic converter, a felony 242
of the fifth degree. 243
(2) If the offender has previously been convicted of or 244
pleaded guilty to a violation of Chapter 2911. or 2913. of the 245
Revised Code, receiving a stolen catalytic converter is a felony 246
of the fourth degree. 247
(3) If the property involved is one or more catalytic 248
converters and the offender is a business entity, a violation of 249
this section is enterprise receipt of stolen catalytic 250
converters and, notwithstanding section 2929.31 of the Revised 251
Code, is punishable by a fine of not less than ten thousand 252
dollars and not more than fifty thousand dollars per violation, 253
regardless of the number of items involved in the violation. 254
(4) The clerk of the court shall pay any fine imposed 255
pursuant to division (F) of this section to the county, 256
township, municipal corporation, park district, as created 257

S. B. No. 242 Page 10
As Introduced
pursuant to section 511.18 or 1545.04 of the Revised Code, or 258
state law enforcement agencies in this state that primarily were 259
responsible for or involved in arresting and prosecuting the 260
offender. 261
Sec. 4737.04. (A) As used in this section and sections 262
4737.041, 4737.042, 4737.043, 4737.044, 4737.045, 4737.046, and 263
4737.99 of the Revised Code: 264
(1) "Scrap metal dealer" means the owner or operator of a 265
business that purchases or receives scrap metal for the purpose 266
of sorting, grading, and shipping metals to third parties for 267
direct or indirect melting into new products. 268
(2) "Special purchase article" means all of the following: 269
(a) Beer kegs; 270
(b) Cable, wire, electrical components, and other 271
equipment used in providing cable service or any utility 272
service, including, but not limited to, copper or aluminum 273
coverings, housings, or enclosures related thereto; 274
(c) Grave markers, sculptures, plaques, and vases made out 275
of metal, the appearance of which suggests that the articles 276
have been obtained from a cemetery; 277
(d) Guard rails for bridges, highways, and roads; highway 278
and street signs; street light poles and fixtures; worker access 279
hole covers, water meter covers, and other similar types of 280
utility access covers; traffic directional and control signs and 281
light signals, metal marked with the name of a political 282
subdivision of the state, and other metal articles that are 283
purchased and installed for use upon authorization of the state 284
or any political subdivision of the state; 285

S. B. No. 242 Page 11
As Introduced
(e) Historical, commemorative, and memorial markers and 286
plaques made out of metal; 287
(f) Four-wheel metal carts, commonly referred to as 288
"grocery carts," that are generally used by individuals to 289
collect and transport consumer goods while shopping; 290
(g) Four-wheel metal carts, commonly referred to as "metal 291
bossies," that are used to transport or merchandise food 292
products that are stored in crates, shells, or trays; 293
(h) Railroad material, including journal brasses, rail 294
spikes, rails, tie plates, frogs, and communication wire; 295
(i) Metal trays, merchandise containers, or similar 296
transport containers used by a product producer, distributor, 297
retailer, or an agent of a product producer, distributor, or 298
retailer as a means for the bulk transportation, storage, or 299
carrying of retail containers of milk, baked goods, eggs, or 300
bottled beverage products; 301
(j) "Burnt wire," which is any coated metal wire that has 302
been smelted, burned, or melted thereby removing the 303
manufacturer's or owner's identifying marks. 304
(3) "Bulk merchandise container" has the same meaning as 305
in section 4737.012 of the Revised Code. 306
(4) "Bulk merchandise container dealer" means a dealer who 307
is subject to section 4737.012 of the Revised Code. 308
(5) "Catalytic converter" includes a catalytic converter 309
core, diesel particulate filter, and diesel oxidation catalyst. 310
(6) "Common recycled matter" means bottles and other 311
containers made out of steel, tin, or aluminum and other 312
consumer goods that are metal that are recycled by individual 313

S. B. No. 242 Page 12
As Introduced
consumers and not in the bulk or quantity that could be supplied 314
or recycled by large business establishments. "Common recycled 315
matter" does not include a metal tray used by a product 316
producer, distributor, retailer, or agent of a product producer, 317
distributor, or retailer as a means for the bulk transportation, 318
storage, or carrying of retail containers of milk, baked goods, 319
eggs, or bottled beverage products. 320
(6) (7) "Consumer goods" has the same meaning as in 321
section 1309.102 of the Revised Code. 322
(7) (8) "Recyclable materials" means the metal materials 323
described in division (C)(5) of this section, on the condition 324
that those metal materials are not special purchase articles. 325
(8) (9) "Motor vehicle" has the same meaning as in section 326
4501.01 of the Revised Code. 327
(B)(1) No person shall engage in the business of scrap 328
metal dealing or act as a bulk merchandise container dealer 329
without first registering with the director of public safety in 330
accordance with section 4737.045 of the Revised Code. 331
(2) No person shall receive, purchase, or sell a special 332
purchase article or a bulk merchandise container except as in 333
accordance with sections 4737.012 and 4737.04 to 4737.045 334
4737.046 of the Revised Code. 335
(3) Except as otherwise provided in section 4737.043 of 336
the Revised Code, no person other than a scrap metal dealer 337
shall receive, purchase, or sell more than one used catalytic 338
converter per day. 339
(C) Every scrap metal dealer shall maintain a record book 340
or electronic file, in which the dealer shall keep an accurate 341
and complete record of all articles purchased or received by the 342

S. B. No. 242 Page 13
As Introduced
dealer in the course of the dealer's daily business. The record 343
shall include a copy of any check issued pursuant to division 344
(A)(4) of section 4737.041 of the Revised Code. On and after 345
September 11, 2008, every entry in the record book or electronic 346
file shall be numbered consecutively and, on or after September 347
28, 2012, shall be maintained for inspection in numerical order. 348
Until the registry developed by the director pursuant to section 349
4737.045 of the Revised Code is operational, a dealer shall 350
maintain the record for each article purchased or received for a 351
minimum period of one year after the date the dealer purchased 352
or received the article, except that the dealer shall maintain 353
the photograph required under division (I) of this section only 354
for a period of sixty days after the dealer purchased or 355
received the article. Beginning on the date the registry is 356
operational, a dealer shall maintain the record for each article 357
purchased or received only for a period of sixty days after the 358
date the dealer purchased or received the article. The director 359
shall adopt rules for the format and maintenance of the records 360
required under this division. 361
The records shall contain all of the following: 362
(1) The name and residence of the person from whom the 363
articles were purchased or received, a copy of that person's 364
personal identification card, and a photograph of the person 365
taken pursuant to division (I) of this section; 366
(2) The date and time the scrap metal dealer purchased or 367
received the articles and the weight of the articles as 368
determined by a licensed commercial scale; 369
(3) If the seller or provider of the articles arrives at 370
the dealer's place of business in a motor vehicle, the license 371
plate number of that motor vehicle along with the state that 372

S. B. No. 242 Page 14
As Introduced
issued the license plate; 373
(4) For metal articles that are not recyclable materials, 374
a full and accurate description of each article purchased or 375
received by the dealer that includes identifying letters or 376
marks written, inscribed, or otherwise included on the article 377
and the name and maker of the article if known; 378
(5) For recyclable materials that are not special purchase 379
articles, the following category codes to identify the 380
recyclable materials that the dealer receives: 381
(a) "Number one copper," which includes clean copper pipe, 382
clean copper wire, or other number one copper that does not have 383
solder, paint, or coating; 384
(b) "Number two copper," which includes unclean copper 385
pipe, unclean copper wire, or other number two copper; 386
(c) "Sheet copper," which includes copper roofing, copper 387
gutters, copper downspouts, and other sheet copper; 388
(d) "Insulated copper wire"; 389
(e) "Aluminum or copper radiators," which includes 390
aluminum radiators, aluminum copper radiators, and copper 391
radiators; 392
(f) "Red brass," which includes red brass values and other 393
red brass; 394
(g) "Yellow brass," which includes yellow brass fixtures, 395
yellow brass valve and fitting, ornamental brass, and other 396
yellow brass; 397
(h) "Aluminum sheet"; 398
(i) "Aluminum extrusions," which includes aluminum 399

S. B. No. 242 Page 15
As Introduced
bleachers, aluminum benches, aluminum frames, aluminum pipe, and 400
other aluminum extrusions; 401
(j) "Cast aluminum," which includes aluminum grills, 402
lawnmower decks made of aluminum, aluminum motor vehicle parts 403
and rims, and other cast aluminum; 404
(k) "Clean aluminum wire"; 405
(l) "Unclean aluminum wire"; 406
(m) "Aluminum exteriors," which includes aluminum siding, 407
aluminum gutters and downspouts, aluminum shutters, aluminum 408
trim, and other aluminum exterior items; 409
(n) "Contaminated aluminum"; 410
(o) "Stainless steel," which includes, sinks, appliance 411
housing, dishes, pots, pans, pipe, and other items made out of 412
stainless steel; 413
(p) "Large appliances," which includes consumer and other 414
appliances; 415
(q) "Steel structural," which includes all structural 416
steel such as I-beams, trusses, channel iron, and similar steel 417
from buildings; 418
(r) "Miscellaneous steel," which includes steel grates, 419
steel farm machinery, steel industrial machinery, steel motor 420
vehicle frames, and other items made out of steel; 421
(s) "Sheet irons," which includes bicycles, motor vehicle 422
body parts made of iron, and other items made using sheet iron; 423
(t) "Motor vehicle nonbody parts," which includes motor 424
vehicle batteries, radiators, and other nonbody motor vehicle 425
parts; 426

S. B. No. 242 Page 16
As Introduced
(u) "Catalytic converters"; 427
(v) "Lead"; 428
(w) "Electric motors"; 429
(x) "Electronic scrap," which includes any consumer or 430
commercial electronic equipment such as computers, servers, 431
routers, video displays, and similar products. 432
(6) For recyclable materials that are special purchase 433
articles, the relevant category provided in division (A)(2) of 434
this section. 435
(D) Railroad material, including journal brasses, rail 436
spikes, rails, tie plates, frogs, and communication wire, other 437
than purchases and sales under sections 4973.13 to 4973.16 of 438
the Revised Code, shall be held by a scrap metal dealer for a 439
period of thirty days after being purchased or acquired. 440
(E)(1) The records required under division (C) of this 441
section or under section 4737.012 of the Revised Code shall be 442
open for inspection by the representative of any law enforcement 443
agency, railroad police officers, and the director of public 444
safety or the director's designated representative during all 445
business hours. A scrap metal dealer or bulk merchandise 446
container dealer shall do both of the following: 447
(a) Provide a copy of those records to any law enforcement 448
agency or railroad police officer that requests the records or 449
to the director or director's representative, upon request; 450
(b) Prepare a daily electronic report, the content and 451
format of which shall be established in rules adopted by the 452
director, listing all retail transactions that occurred during 453
the preceding day and containing the information described in 454

S. B. No. 242 Page 17
As Introduced
division (C) of this section or division (A) of section 4737.012 455
of the Revised Code, as applicable. The dealer shall 456
electronically transfer, by twelve noon eastern standard time, 457
the report to the director of public safety for inclusion in the 458
registry created pursuant to division (E) of section 4737.045 of 459
the Revised Code. 460
(2) A law enforcement agency may inspect any photographic 461
records collected and maintained by a scrap metal dealer of 462
either yard operations or individual transactions. Records 463
submitted to any law enforcement agency pursuant to this section 464
are not public records for purposes of section 149.43 of the 465
Revised Code. 466
(3) Records submitted to any law enforcement agency, 467
railroad police officer, or the director of public safety or the 468
director's designated representative as required by section 469
4737.012 of the Revised Code and sections 4737.04 to 4737.045 470
4737.046 of the Revised Code shall not be public records for the 471
purposes of section 149.43 of the Revised Code. 472
(4) Notwithstanding division (E)(3) of this section, the 473
names and addresses of scrap metal dealers and bulk merchandise 474
container dealers shall be made available to the public by the 475
director upon request. 476
(5) A person who claims to own a stolen article that may 477
be identified in those records, or an agent of that person, who 478
provides proof of having filed a stolen property report with the 479
appropriate law enforcement agency, may request those records. 480
The law enforcement agency shall provide those records upon a 481
request made by such a person or that person's agent, but the 482
law enforcement agency shall redact information that reveals the 483
name of the seller of any article and the price the dealer paid 484

S. B. No. 242 Page 18
As Introduced
for any article the dealer purchased or the estimated value of 485
any article the dealer received. The law enforcement agency 486
shall determine which records to provide, based upon the time 487
period that the alleged theft is reported to have taken place. A 488
law enforcement agency may charge or collect a fee for providing 489
records as required by this section. 490
(6) The director of public safety, following proper notice 491
and hearing in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, 492
shall impose a civil penalty of five hundred dollars on a person 493
that violates division (E)(1)(b) of this section. The director 494
shall impose an additional fine of five hundred dollars for each 495
day the violation continues. The director shall deposit the fine 496
into the state treasury to the credit of the infrastructure 497
protection fund created under section 4737.045 of the Revised 498
Code. 499
(7) The director shall suspend, in accordance with Chapter 500
119. of the Revised Code, the registration of a person that 501
violates division (E)(1)(b) of this section until such time as 502
the director determines that the person has taken necessary 503
steps to comply with that division. A person whose registration 504
is suspended under this division may petition the director for 505
reinstatement not more than once every ninety days. The 506
director's determination as to whether to grant such a petition 507
and reinstate the person's registration is subject to appeal 508
under section 119.12 of the Revised Code. 509
(F)(1) No scrap metal dealer shall purchase or receive any 510
metal articles, and no bulk merchandise container dealer shall 511
purchase or receive any bulk merchandise containers, from a 512
person who refuses to show the dealer the person's personal 513
identification card, or who refuses to allow the dealer to take 514

S. B. No. 242 Page 19
As Introduced
a photograph of the person as required under division (I) of 515
this section or of the person or container as required under 516
division (B) of section 4737.012 of the Revised Code. 517
(2) The law enforcement agency that serves the 518
jurisdiction in which a scrap metal dealer or a bulk merchandise 519
container dealer is located shall provide to the scrap metal 520
dealer or bulk merchandise container dealer a searchable, 521
electronic list prepared in accordance with rules adopted by the 522
director, as that agency determines appropriate, of the names 523
and descriptions of persons known to be thieves or receivers of 524
stolen property. The law enforcement agency may request the 525
appropriate clerk of courts to provide the list. No scrap metal 526
dealer or bulk merchandise container dealer shall purchase or 527
receive articles from any person who is either identified on the 528
list the dealer receives from the law enforcement agency, or who 529
appears on the lists made available by the director pursuant to 530
division (E) of section 4737.045 of the Revised Code. The law 531
enforcement agency also shall provide the list, in an electronic 532
format, to the department of public safety, in an electronic 533
format in accordance with rules adopted by the director, for 534
inclusion in the registry created in under division (E) of 535
section 4737.045 of the Revised Code. 536
(3) A law enforcement agency shall submit all records of 537
any investigation into a scrap metal dealer or bulk merchandise 538
container dealer to the registry created pursuant to division 539
(E) of section 4737.045 of the Revised Code. 540
(4) No scrap metal dealer or bulk merchandise container 541
dealer shall purchase or receive any special purchase articles 542
or bulk merchandise containers from any person who is under 543
eighteen years of age. 544

S. B. No. 242 Page 20
As Introduced
(4) (5) No scrap metal dealer shall purchase or receive 545
any special purchase article without complying with division (C) 546
and (I) of this section and division (B), (C), or (D) of section 547
4737.041 of the Revised Code. 548
(5) (6) No scrap metal dealer shall purchase or receive 549
more than one catalytic converter per day from the same person 550
except from a motor vehicle dealer as defined in section 4517.01 551
of the Revised Code. 552
(6) (7) No scrap metal dealer shall purchase or receive a 553
beer keg that is marked with a company name or logo except from 554
a manufacturer of beer as described in section 4303.02 of the 555
Revised Code or an agent authorized by the manufacturer to 556
dispose of damaged kegs. 557
(7) (8) No scrap metal dealer shall treat a transaction as 558
exempt from section 4737.04 or 4737.041 of the Revised Code 559
unless the seller scrap metal dealer provides evidence of 560
satisfying division (D)(3) of one or more of the exemptions 561
under section 4737.043 of the Revised Code. 562
(G)(G)(1) Every scrap metal dealer and bulk merchandise 563
container dealer shall post a notice in a conspicuous place on 564
the dealer's premises notifying persons who may wish to transact 565
business with the dealer of the penalties applicable to any 566
person who does any of the following: 567
(1) (a) Provides a false personal identification card to 568
the dealer; 569
(2) (b) With purpose to defraud, provides any other false 570
information to the dealer in connection with the dealer's duty 571
to maintain the records required under division (C) of this 572
section or under section 4737.012 of the Revised Code; 573

S. B. No. 242 Page 21
As Introduced
(3) (c) Violates section 2913.02 of the Revised Code. 574
(2)(a) Every scrap metal dealer and bulk merchandise 575
container dealer shall post a copy of the dealer's registration 576
in a conspicuous place on the dealer's premises. 577
(b) The director of public safety, following proper notice 578
and hearing in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, 579
shall impose a civil penalty of five hundred dollars on any 580
person that violates division (G)(2)(a) of this section and 581
shall deposit that penalty into the state treasury to the credit 582
of the infrastructure protection fund created under section 583
4737.045 of the Revised Code. 584
(H)(1) Except as otherwise provided in division (F)(2) of 585
this section, a clerk of courts or an employee of a clerk of 586
courts; a chief of police, marshal, or other chief law 587
enforcement officer; a sheriff, constable, or chief of police of 588
a township police department or police district police force; a 589
deputy, officer, or employee of the law enforcement agency 590
served by the marshal or the municipal or township chief, the 591
office of the sheriff, or the constable; and an employee of the 592
department of public safety is immune from liability in a civil 593
action, including an action for defamation, libel, or slander, 594
to recover damages for injury, death, or loss to persons or 595
property or reputation allegedly caused by an act or omission in 596
connection with compiling and providing the list required by 597
division (F)(2) of this section. 598
(2) The immunity described in division (H)(1) of this 599
section does not apply to a person described in that division 600
if, in relation to the act or omission in question, any of the 601
following applies: 602

S. B. No. 242 Page 22
As Introduced
(a) The act or omission was manifestly outside the scope 603
of the person's employment or official responsibilities. 604
(b) The act or omission was with malicious purpose, in bad 605
faith, or in a wanton or reckless manner. 606
(c) Liability for the act or omission is expressly imposed 607
by a section of the Revised Code. 608
(I) Every scrap metal dealer shall take a photograph, in 609
accordance with rules adopted by the director, of each person 610
who sells or otherwise gives the dealer an article for which the 611
dealer must make record under division (C) of this section. 612
The dealer shall take the required photograph at the time 613
the dealer purchases or receives the article and shall keep the 614
photograph as part of the record in accordance with division (C) 615
of this section. 616
(J)(1) An individual listed as a known thief or receiver 617
of stolen property on a list prepared pursuant to division (F) 618
(2) of this section may request that the individual's name be 619
removed from the list by filing an application with the law 620
enforcement agency responsible for preparing the list. 621
(2) A law enforcement agency receiving an application in 622
accordance with division (J)(1) of this section shall remove the 623
applicant's name from the list of known thieves and receivers of 624
stolen property if the individual has not been convicted of or 625
pleaded guilty to either a misdemeanor that is a theft offense, 626
as defined in section 2913.01 of the Revised Code, within three 627
years immediately prior to the date of the application or a 628
felony that is a theft offense within six years immediately 629
prior to the date of the application. 630
Sec. 4737.045. (A) To register as a scrap metal dealer or 631

S. B. No. 242 Page 23
As Introduced
a bulk merchandise container dealer with the director of public 632
safety as required by division (B) of section 4737.04 of the 633
Revised Code, a person shall do all of the following: 634
(1) Provide the name and street address of the dealer's 635
place of business; 636
(2) Provide the name of the primary owner of the business, 637
and of the manager of the business, if the manager is not the 638
primary owner; 639
(3) Provide the electronic mail address of the business; 640
(4) Provide confirmation that the dealer has the 641
capabilities to electronically connect with the department of 642
public safety for the purpose of sending and receiving 643
information; 644
(5) Provide any other information required by the director 645
in rules the director adopts pursuant to sections 4737.01 to 646
4737.045 4737.046 of the Revised Code; 647
(6) Pay an initial registration fee of two hundred 648
dollars. 649
(B) A person engaging in the business of a scrap metal 650
dealer or a bulk merchandise container dealer in this state on 651
or before September 28, 2012, shall register with the director 652
not later than January 1, 2013. With respect to a person who 653
commences engaging in the business of a scrap metal dealer or a 654
bulk merchandise container dealer after September 28, 2012, the 655
person shall register with the director pursuant to this section 656
prior to commencing business as a scrap metal dealer or a bulk 657
merchandise container dealer. 658
(C) A registration issued to a scrap metal dealer or a 659

S. B. No. 242 Page 24
As Introduced
bulk merchandise container dealer pursuant to this section is 660
valid for a period of one year. A dealer shall renew the 661
registration in accordance with the rules adopted by the 662
director and pay a renewal fee of one hundred fifty dollars to 663
cover the costs of operating and maintaining the registry 664
created pursuant to division (E) of this section. 665
(D) A scrap metal dealer or a bulk merchandise container 666
dealer registered under this section shall prominently display a 667
copy of the annual registration certificate received from the 668
director pursuant to division (E)(2) of this section. 669
(E) The director shall do all of the following: 670
(1) Develop and implement, by January 1, 2014, and 671
maintain as a registry a secure database for use by law 672
enforcement agencies that is capable of all of the following: 673
(a) Receiving and securely storing all of the information 674
required by division (A) of this section and the daily 675
transaction data that scrap metal dealers and bulk merchandise 676
dealers are required to send pursuant to division (E)(1) of 677
section 4737.04 of the Revised Code; 678
(b) Providing secure search capabilities to law 679
enforcement agencies for enforcement purposes; 680
(c) Creating a link and retransmission capability for 681
receipt of routine scrap theft alerts published by the institute 682
of scrap recycling industries recycled materials association for 683
transmission to dealers and law enforcement agencies in the 684
state; 685
(d) Making the electronic lists prepared pursuant to 686
division (F)(2) of section 4737.04 of the Revised Code available 687
through an electronic searchable format for individual law 688

S. B. No. 242 Page 25
As Introduced
enforcement agencies and for dealers in the state; 689
(e) Providing, without charge, interlink programming 690
enabling the transfer of information to dealers; 691
(f) Identifying parties submitting reports and inquiries 692
to the registry. 693
(2) Issue, reissue, or deny registration to dealers; 694
(3) Adopt rules to enforce sections 4737.01 to 4737.045 695
4737.046 of the Revised Code, rules establishing procedures to 696
renew a registration issued under this section, rules for the 697
format and maintenance for the records required under division 698
(A) of section 4737.012 of the Revised Code or division (C) of 699
section 4737.04 of the Revised Code, and rules regarding the 700
delivery of the report required by division (E)(1) of section 701
4737.04 of the Revised Code to the registry, which shall be used 702
exclusively by law enforcement agencies. 703
(F) A scrap metal dealer or bulk merchandise container 704
dealer may search, modify, or update only the dealer's own 705
business data contained within the registry established in 706
division (E) of this section. 707
(G) All fees received by the director pursuant to this 708
section and division (F) of section 4737.99 of the Revised Code 709
shall be used to develop and maintain the registry required 710
under this section and for the department of public safety's 711
operating expenses. The fees shall be deposited into the 712
infrastructure protection fund which is hereby created in the 713
state treasury. 714
(H)(1) The director of public safety shall not issue a 715
registration to, or renew the registration of, a person who was 716
convicted of, or pleaded guilty to, a violation of section 717

S. B. No. 242 Page 26
As Introduced
4737.041 of the Revised Code, a violation of section 2923.03 of 718
the Revised Code when division (G) of section 4737.99 of the 719
Revised Code applies, a violation of section 2913.02 of the 720
Revised Code when the person is sentenced pursuant to division 721
(B)(10) of that section, or a violation of section 2913.51 of 722
the Revised Code when the person is sentenced pursuant to 723
division (F) of that section. 724
(2) The director of public safety shall revoke the 725
registration of a person who is convicted of or pleads guilty to 726
a violation of section 4737.041 of the Revised Code, a violation 727
of section 2923.03 of the Revised Code when division (G) of 728
section 4737.99 of the Revised Code applies, a violation of 729
section 2913.02 of the Revised Code when the person is sentenced 730
pursuant to division (B)(10) of that section, or a violation of 731
section 2913.51 of the Revised Code when the person is sentenced 732
pursuant to division (F) of that section. 733
Sec. 4737.046. (A) The director of public safety shall 734
conduct an investigation under this section upon receiving a 735
bona fide complaint alleging, or upon reasonable suspicion, that 736
either of the following apply: 737
(1) That a scrap metal dealer, a bulk merchandise 738
container dealer, or any employee, officer, or agent of a scrap 739
metal dealer or bulk merchandise container dealer has violated, 740
is violating, or will violate any provision of sections 4737.01 741
to 4737.046 of the Revised Code; 742
(2) That a person who is not registered under section 743
4737.045 of the Revised Code appears to be acting as a scrap 744
metal dealer or bulk merchandise container dealer. 745
(B) As part of the investigation, the director or local 746

S. B. No. 242 Page 27
As Introduced
law enforcement may do any of the following: 747
(1) Search the accused person's premises during the 748
person's regular work hours or between the hours of eight a.m. 749
and five p.m., Monday through Friday; 750
(2) Compel witnesses by subpoena to appear and testify in 751
relation to the investigation; 752
(3) Compel by subpoena duces tecum the production of any 753
books, papers, documents, or other records pertaining to the 754
investigation. 755
(C) If a person does not comply with a subpoena or 756
subpoena duces tecum issued under division (B) of this section, 757
the director or local law enforcement may apply to the court of 758
common pleas of Franklin county or of the county in which the 759
person conducts business for an order compelling the person to 760
comply with the subpoena or subpoena duces tecum or, for failure 761
to do so, be held in contempt of court. 762
(D)(1) If as a result of an investigation the director or 763
local law enforcement finds that a person described in division 764
(A)(1) of this section violated any provision of sections 765
4737.01 to 4737.046 of the Revised Code, the director may 766
suspend the scrap metal dealer's or bulk merchandise container 767
dealer's registration and shall reinstate the registration only 768
upon receiving evidence that the scrap metal dealer or bulk 769
merchandise container dealer has remedied the violation. The 770
director may revoke a registration if the director finds a 771
subsequent violation of any provision of sections 4737.01 to 772
4737.046 of the Revised Code in any subsequent investigation. 773
(2) No person shall undertake any activities that require 774
registration under section 4737.045 of the Revised Code 775

S. B. No. 242 Page 28
As Introduced
following a suspension or revocation under division (D)(1) of 776
this section. 777
(3) Following such a suspension or revocation, the 778
director or local law enforcement shall conduct a follow-up 779
investigation to determine whether the person violated division 780
(D)(2) of this section. If the director or local law enforcement 781
determines the person violated division (D)(2) of this section, 782
the director shall seek an injunction from the court of common 783
pleas of Franklin county or of the county in which the person 784
conducts business ordering the person to cease the violation. 785
(E)(1) If, as a result of an investigation, the director 786
or local law enforcement finds that a person acted as a scrap 787
metal dealer or bulk merchandise container dealer without a 788
registration, the director shall do both of the following: 789
(a) Seek an injunction from the court of common pleas of 790
Franklin county or of the county in which the person conducts 791
business ordering the person to cease the violation; 792
(b) Impose a civil penalty of ten thousand dollars in 793
accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. Each day the 794
violation occurred or continues to occur constitutes a separate 795
violation and is subject to a separate penalty, except that the 796
penalty for each consecutive day after the first day shall be 797
one thousand dollars. 798
(2) The director shall deposit all penalties collected 799
pursuant to division (E) of this section into the state treasury 800
to the credit of the infrastructure protection fund created 801
under section 4737.045 of the Revised Code. Notwithstanding any 802
contrary provision of the Revised Code, all such penalties shall 803
be expended only to conduct investigations authorized under this 804

S. B. No. 242 Page 29
As Introduced
section. 805
(3) If a person fails to pay a civil penalty imposed under 806
division (E) of this section within the time prescribed by the 807
director, the director shall certify the amount of the penalty 808
and the person's name to the attorney general for collection 809
under section 131.02 of the Revised Code. In addition to the 810
penalty, the attorney general may assess, and the person shall 811
pay, a fee covering the costs of collecting the penalty. 812
(F)(1) No person shall do any of the following when 813
applying for registration or renewal under section 4737.045 of 814
the Revised Code: 815
(a) Engage in fraud; 816
(b) Knowingly provide false information; 817
(c) Knowingly fail to disclose relevant information that 818
would result in a denial of or nonrenewal of a registration or 819
license. 820
(2) The director shall impose a civil penalty of five 821
hundred dollars on any person who violates division (F)(1) of 822
this section in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised 823
Code. The director shall deposit all such penalties into the 824
state treasury to the credit of the infrastructure protection 825
fund created under section 4737.045 of the Revised Code. 826
(G) Any refusal to renew and any denial, suspension, or 827
revocation of any registration required under section 4737.045 828
of the Revised Code is subject to Chapter 119. of the Revised 829
Code. 830
(H) The director shall record information on all 831
noninvestigative visits made by the director to a scrap metal 832

S. B. No. 242 Page 30
As Introduced
dealer or bulk merchandise container dealer. The director shall 833
report that information to the public on a quarterly basis via 834
the department of commerce's web site. 835
Sec. 4737.98. Notwithstanding any provision of section 836
121.95 of the Revised Code to the contrary, a regulatory 837
restriction contained in a rule adopted under this chapter is 838
not subject to sections 121.95 to 121.953 of the Revised Code. 839
Sec. 4737.99. (A) Except as specified in divisions (B), 840
(C), (D), (E), and (F) of this section, whoever violates 841
sections 4737.01 to 4737.11 of the Revised Code, shall be fined 842
not less than twenty-five nor more than one thousand dollars and 843
the costs of prosecution. 844
(B) Whoever violates division (F)(2) of section 4737.10 of 845
the Revised Code is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth 846
degree. 847
(C) Whoever (C)(1) Except as provided in division (C)(2) 848
of this section, whoever fails to comply with or violates 849
section 4737.01, 4737.012, or 4737.041, division (C), (D), (E), 850
(F), (G), or (I) of section 4737.04, or division (D) of section 851
4737.045 of the Revised Code is guilty of a misdemeanor of the 852
first degree. If the offender one time previously has violated 853
or failed to comply with section 4737.01, 4737.012, or 4737.041, 854
division (C), (D), (E), (F), (G), or (I) of section 4737.04, or 855
division (D) of section 4737.045 of the Revised Code, the 856
violation or failure is a felony of the fifth degree. If the 857
offender two or more times previously has violated or failed to 858
comply with section 4737.01, 4737.012, or 4737.041, division 859
(C), (D), (E), (F), (G), or (I) of section 4737.04, or division 860
(D) of section 4737.045 of the Revised Code, the violation or 861
failure is a felony of the fourth degree. For any second or 862

S. B. No. 242 Page 31
As Introduced
subsequent violation of or failure to comply with section 863
4737.01, 4737.012, or 4737.041, or division (C), (D), (E), (F), 864
(G), or (I) of section 4737.04, or division (D) of section 865
4737.045 of the Revised Code, a court may suspend the 866
registration issued to the scrap metal dealer or bulk 867
merchandise container dealer under section 4737.045 of the 868
Revised Code for a period of ninety days, during which time 869
period the person shall not engage in the business of a scrap 870
metal dealer or a bulk merchandise container dealer, as 871
applicable. 872
(2) Notwithstanding section 2929.31 of the Revised Code, a 873
business entity that, with respect to the sale, purchase, or 874
receipt of a catalytic converter, violates section 4737.04 of 875
the Revised Code shall be fined not less than ten thousand 876
dollars and not more than fifty thousand dollars per violation. 877
(D) Whoever violates division (B)(1) of section 4737.04 of 878
the Revised Code is guilty of a felony of the fifth degree. The 879
court also shall enjoin the person from engaging in the business 880
of a scrap metal dealer or a bulk merchandise dealer. 881
(E) Whoever violates division (B)(2) of section 4737.04 of 882
the Revised Code is guilty of a felony of the fifth degree for 883
the first offense and a felony of the third degree for any 884
subsequent offense. 885
(F) Any motor vehicle used in the theft or illegal 886
transportation of metal shall be impounded for at least thirty 887
days and not more than sixty days. If the same motor vehicle is 888
used in connection with a second or subsequent theft or illegal 889
transportation of metal, the motor vehicle shall be impounded 890
for at least sixty days and not more than one hundred eighty 891
days. Any motor vehicle used in the theft or illegal 892

S. B. No. 242 Page 32
As Introduced
transportation of a special purchase article or bulk merchandise 893
container shall be impounded for at least ninety days and not 894
more than three hundred sixty days. A motor vehicle impounded 895
pursuant to this division shall be stored at a municipal 896
corporation impound lot, if available, or at a lot owned by a 897
private entity or another governmental unit that the municipal 898
corporation utilizes for the purpose of impounding a motor 899
vehicle. An impounded motor vehicle may be recovered from the 900
impound lot at the end of the impound term upon payment of fees. 901
(G) A person is complicit under section 2923.03 of the 902
Revised Code if the person sells a catalytic converter to 903
another person who, in the purchase or receipt of the catalytic 904
converter, violates division (B) or (F)(1) of section 4737.04 of 905
the Revised Code. 906
(H) If a transaction involving the purchase or sale of a 907
used catalytic converter formed the basis of an offense under 908
division (C) or (E) of this section, the clerk of the court 909
shall pay any fine imposed to the county, township, municipal 910
corporation, park district, as created pursuant to section 911
511.18 or 1545.04 of the Revised Code, or state law enforcement 912
agencies in this state that primarily were responsible for, or 913
involved in, arresting and prosecuting, the offender. 914
Sec. 4738.03. (A) No person licensed as a motor vehicle 915
salvage dealer under this chapter shall engage do either of the 916
following: 917
(1) Engage in the business of selling at retail salvage 918
motor vehicle parts or salvage motor vehicles, unless the 919
business is operated primarily for the purpose of selling at 920
retail salvage motor vehicle parts. Any person operating such a 921
business primarily for the purpose of selling at retail salvage 922

S. B. No. 242 Page 33
As Introduced
motor vehicle parts may secondarily sell at retail salvage motor 923
vehicles or manufacture a product of gradable scrap metal for 924
sale to scrap metal processors or any other consumer. 925
(2) Purchase or accept individual motor vehicle parts, 926
such as a catalytic converter as defined in section 4737.04 of 927
the Revised Code. 928
(B) No person licensed as a salvage motor vehicle auction 929
under this chapter shall: 930
(1) Knowingly sell a salvage motor vehicle to anyone other 931
than an authorized purchaser; 932
(2) Sell a salvage motor vehicle when having reasonable 933
cause to believe it is not offered by the legal owner thereof; 934
(3) Fail to make an Ohio salvage certificate of title 935
available to the purchaser of a salvage motor vehicle sold by 936
the salvage motor vehicle auction, before payment for the 937
salvage motor vehicle is completed; 938
(4) Operate as a motor vehicle salvage dealer at the same 939
location where any salvage motor vehicle auction is operated. 940
(C) No person licensed as a salvage motor vehicle pool 941
under this chapter shall: 942
(1) Knowingly sell a salvage motor vehicle to anyone other 943
than an authorized purchaser; 944
(2) Sell a salvage motor vehicle when having reasonable 945
cause to believe it is not offered by the legal owner thereof; 946
(3) Fail to make an Ohio salvage certificate of title 947
available to the purchaser of a salvage motor vehicle sold by 948
the salvage motor vehicle pool, before payment for the salvage 949

S. B. No. 242 Page 34
As Introduced
motor vehicle is completed; 950
(4) Operate as a motor vehicle salvage dealer at the same 951
location where any salvage motor vehicle pool is operated. 952
Sec. 4738.07. (A) Except as otherwise provided in division 953
(B) of this section, the registrar of motor vehicles shall deny 954
the application of any person for a license under this chapter 955
and refuse to issue the person a license if the registrar finds 956
that the applicant: 957
(1) Has made false statement of a material fact in the 958
individual's application; 959
(2) Has not complied with sections 4738.01 to 4738.15 of 960
the Revised Code: 961
(3) Has habitually defaulted on financial obligations; 962
(4) Has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a 963
disqualifying offense, provided the registrar complies with 964
section 9.79 of the Revised Code; 965
(5) Has been guilty of a fraudulent act in connection with 966
dealing in salvage motor vehicles or when operating as a motor 967
vehicle salvage dealer, salvage motor vehicle auction, or 968
salvage motor vehicle pool; 969
(6) Is insolvent; 970
(7) Is of insufficient responsibility to assure the prompt 971
payment of any final judgments which might reasonably be entered 972
against the individual because of the transaction of the 973
individual's business during the period of the license applied 974
for; 975
(8) Has no established place of business; or 976

S. B. No. 242 Page 35
As Introduced
(9) Has less than twelve months prior to said application, 977
been denied a license under this chapter; or 978
(10) Was convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of 979
section 2923.03 of the Revised Code when division (G) of section 980
4737.99 of the Revised Code applies, a violation of section 981
2913.02 of the Revised Code when the person is sentenced 982
pursuant to division (B)(10) of that section, or a violation of 983
section 2913.51 of the Revised Code when the person is sentenced 984
pursuant to division (F) of that section. 985
(B) In (B)(1) Except as provided in division (B)(2) of 986
this section, in considering a renewal of an individual's 987
license, the registrar shall not consider any conviction or plea 988
of guilty prior to the initial licensing. However, the registrar 989
may consider a conviction or plea of guilty if it occurred after 990
the individual was initially licensed, or after the most recent 991
license renewal. 992
(2) The registrar shall not renew an individual's license 993
if the individual was convicted of or pleaded guilty to a 994
violation of section 2923.03 of the Revised Code when division 995
(G) of section 4737.99 of the Revised Code applies, a violation 996
of section 2913.02 of the Revised Code when the person is 997
sentenced pursuant to division (B)(10) of that section, or a 998
violation of section 2913.51 of the Revised Code when the person 999
is sentenced pursuant to division (F) of that section. 1000
(C) The registrar may grant a person a conditional license 1001
that lasts for one year. After the one-year period has expired, 1002
the license is no longer considered conditional, and the person 1003
shall be considered fully licensed. 1004
(D) If the applicant is a corporation or partnership, the 1005

S. B. No. 242 Page 36
As Introduced
registrar may refuse to issue a license if any officer, 1006
director, or partner of the applicant has been guilty of any 1007
disqualifying offense and the refusal is in accordance with 1008
section 9.79 of the Revised Code. The registrar's finding may be 1009
based upon facts contained in the application or upon any other 1010
information which the registrar may have. Immediately upon 1011
denying an application for any of the reasons in this section, 1012
the registrar shall enter a final order together with the 1013
registrar's findings and certify the same to the motor vehicle 1014
salvage dealer's licensing board. 1015
(E) If the registrar refuses an application for a license, 1016
the reasons for such refusal shall be put in writing. An 1017
applicant who has been refused a license may appeal from the 1018
action of the registrar to the motor vehicle salvage dealer's 1019
licensing board in the manner prescribed in section 4738.12 of 1020
the Revised Code. 1021
(F) The registrar of motor vehicles shall not adopt, 1022
maintain, renew, or enforce any rule, or otherwise preclude in 1023
any way, an individual from renewing a license under this 1024
chapter due to any past criminal activity or interpretation of 1025
moral character, except as pursuant to division (B) of this 1026
section. If the registrar denies an individual a license or 1027
license renewal, the reasons for such denial shall be put in 1028
writing. 1029
Sec. 4738.12. The motor vehicle salvage dealer's licensing 1030
board shall hear appeals which may be taken from an order of the 1031
registrar of motor vehicles, refusing to issue a license. All 1032
appeals from any order of the registrar refusing to issue any 1033
license upon proper application made must be taken within thirty 1034
days from the date of the order, or the order is final and 1035

S. B. No. 242 Page 37
As Introduced
conclusive. All appeals from orders of the registrar must be by 1036
petition in writing and verified under oath by the applicant 1037
whose application for license has been denied, and must set 1038
forth the reason why, in the petitioner's opinion, the order of 1039
the registrar is not correct. In appeals the board may make 1040
investigation to determine the correctness and legality of the 1041
order of the registrar. 1042
The board may make rules governing its actions relative to 1043
the suspension and revocation of licenses and may, upon its own 1044
motion, and shall, upon the verified complaint in writing of any 1045
person, investigate the conduct of any licensee under this 1046
chapter. The board shall suspend or revoke or notify the 1047
registrar to refuse to renew any license if any ground existed 1048
upon which the license would have been refused, or if a ground 1049
exists which would be cause for refusal to issue a license. 1050
The board may suspend or revoke any license if the 1051
licensee has in any manner violated the rules issued pursuant to 1052
sections 4738.01 to 4738.16 of the Revised Code, or has been 1053
convicted of committing a felony or violating any law which in 1054
any way relates to the theft of motor vehicles. 1055
The board shall revoke any license if the licensee is 1056
convicted of or pleads guilty to a violation of section 2923.03 1057
of the Revised Code when division (G) of section 4737.99 of the 1058
Revised Code applies, a violation of section 2913.02 of the 1059
Revised Code when the licensee is sentenced pursuant to division 1060
(B)(10) of that section, or a violation of section 2913.51 of 1061
the Revised Code when the licensee is sentenced pursuant to 1062
division (F) of that section. 1063
Sec. 4775.09. (A)(1) In accordance with Chapter 119. of 1064
the Revised Code, the motor vehicle repair board may refuse to 1065

S. B. No. 242 Page 38
As Introduced
issue or renew a registration certificate or may determine 1066
whether to waive a suspension of a registration certificate as 1067
provided in division (D) of section 4775.07 of the Revised Code. 1068
(2) Within ten days after receipt of an abstract from a 1069
county court judge, mayor of a mayor's court, or clerk of a 1070
court of record indicating a violation of division (D) of 1071
section 4513.241 of the Revised Code, the board shall determine 1072
whether the person named in the abstract is registered with the 1073
board and, if the person is so registered, shall further 1074
determine whether the person previously has been convicted of or 1075
pleaded guilty to a violation of that section. If the person 1076
previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a 1077
violation of that section, the board, in accordance with Chapter 1078
119. of the Revised Code but without a prior hearing, shall 1079
suspend the person's registration for a period of not more than 1080
one hundred eighty days. 1081
(B) The court of common pleas of Franklin county has 1082
exclusive jurisdiction over any person who conducts, or attempts 1083
to conduct, business as a motor vehicle repair operator in 1084
violation of this chapter or any rule adopted under this 1085
chapter. The court, on application of the board, may issue an 1086
injunction, a cease and desist order, or other appropriate order 1087
restraining the person from continuing the violation. This 1088
section shall operate in addition to and shall not prohibit the 1089
enforcement of any other law. 1090
(C) Upon the request of the executive director or as a 1091
result of complaints, the board shall investigate the alleged 1092
violation. 1093
(D) No person required to be registered under this chapter 1094
shall have the benefit of any lien for labor or materials unless 1095

S. B. No. 242 Page 39
As Introduced
the person is registered under this chapter. 1096
(E) No person whose application for registration under 1097
this chapter is denied shall open or operate a facility for 1098
business as a motor vehicle collision repair facility or motor 1099
vehicle window tint installation facility under the name of the 1100
person designated in the application for a registration 1101
certificate or under any other name prior to registering as a 1102
motor vehicle repair operator in accordance with this chapter. 1103
(F)(1) The board shall not issue a registration to or 1104
renew the registration of a person who was convicted of or 1105
pleaded guilty to a violation of section 2923.03 of the Revised 1106
Code when division (G) of section 4737.99 of the Revised Code 1107
applies, a violation of section 2913.02 of the Revised Code when 1108
the person is sentenced pursuant to division (B)(10) of that 1109
section, or a violation of section 2913.51 of the Revised Code 1110
when the person is sentenced pursuant to division (F) of that 1111
section. 1112
(2) The board shall revoke the registration of a person 1113
who is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violation of section 1114
2923.03 of the Revised Code when division (G) of section 4737.99 1115
of the Revised Code applies, a violation of section 2913.02 of 1116
the Revised Code when the person is sentenced pursuant to 1117
division (B)(10) of that section, or a violation of section 1118
2913.51 of the Revised Code when the person is sentenced 1119
pursuant to division (F) of that section. 1120
Section 2. That existing sections 2913.02, 2913.51, 1121
4737.04, 4737.045, 4737.99, 4738.03, 4738.07, 4738.12, and 1122
4775.09 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. 1123
Section 3. All items in this act are hereby appropriated 1124

S. B. No. 242 Page 40
As Introduced
as designated out of any moneys in the state treasury to the 1125
credit of the designated fund. For all operating appropriations 1126
made in this act, those in the first column are for fiscal year 1127
2026 and those in the second column are for fiscal year 2027. 1128
The operating appropriations made in this act are in addition to 1129
any other operating appropriations made for these fiscal years. 1130
Section 4. 1131
1132
1 2 3 4 5
A AGO ATTORNEY GENERAL
B General Revenue Fund
C GRF 055451 Catalytic Converter Theft $1,500,000 $1,000,000
Task Force
D TOTAL GRF General Revenue Fund $1,500,000 $1,000,000
E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $1,500,000 $1,000,000
CATALYTIC CONVERTER THEFT TASK FORCE 1133
The foregoing appropriation item 055451, Catalytic 1134
Converter Theft Task Force, shall be used by the Organized Crime 1135
Investigations Commission to support the operations of any 1136
catalytic converter theft task forces established by the 1137
Commission pursuant to section 177.02 of the Revised Code. 1138
Section 5. Within the limits set forth in this act, the 1139
Director of Budget and Management shall establish accounts 1140
indicating the source and amount of funds for each appropriation 1141
made in this act, and shall determine the manner in which 1142
appropriation accounts shall be maintained. Expenditures from 1143

S. B. No. 242 Page 41
As Introduced
operating appropriations contained in this act shall be 1144
accounted for as though made in, and are subject to all 1145
applicable provisions of, H.B. 96 of the 136th General Assembly. 1146